Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,111
Prohibition of rebate and fee splitting.

A title insurance agent or other person shall not provide or receive, directly or indirectly, any consideration for the referral of title insurance business or escrow or other services provided by a title insurance agent.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 34.